Idaho, session 2026, S1426.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $409,600 $1,133,200 $1,542,800
B. CAPITAL FACILITIES:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $43,000 $43,000
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund 15,500,000 15,500,000
TOTAL $15,543,000 $15,543,000
C. AERONAUTICS:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $351,600 $80,900 $432,500


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $1,500 0 0 1,500
TOTAL $1,500 $351,600 $80,900 $434,000
DIVISION TOTAL $1,500 $761,200 $16,757,100 $17,519,800
II. MOTOR VEHICLES:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $378,400 $422,000 $800,400
III. HIGHWAY OPERATIONS:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $3,102,500 $72,888,200 $75,990,700
IV. CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION & RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $4,255,900 $4,255,900
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 292,500 292,500
TOTAL $4,548,400 $4,548,400
GRAND TOTAL $1,500 $4,242,100 $94,615,700 $98,859,300
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
there is hereby reduced from the Idaho Transportation Department $1,500 from
the Highway Operations Program for personnel costs from the State Highway
(Dedicated) Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE CAPITAL FACILITIES PRO-
GRAM. There is hereby reappropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the Idaho Transportation Department from the State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund and the State Highway (Dedicated) Fund in the Capital Facilities Pro-
gram for fiscal year 2026, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures in the
Capital Facilities Program for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation


amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE AERONAUTICS PROGRAM.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department any
unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the
Idaho Transportation Department from the State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund in the Aeronautics Program as trustee and benefit payments for airport
development grants for fiscal year 2026, to be used for nonrecurring expen-
ditures for airport development grants for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappro-
priation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative
Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION
AND RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION DIVISION. There is hereby reappropriated to
the Idaho Transportation Department any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department
from the State Highway Fund and the Transportation Expansion and Congestion
Mitigation Fund for the Contract Construction and Right-of-Way Acquisition
Division for fiscal year 2026, in a total amount not to exceed $300,000,000
from the State Highway Fund and/or the Transportation Expansion and Con-
gestion Mitigation Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the
Contract Construction and Right-of-Way Acquisition Division for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall
confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program,
with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropria-
tion authorized herein.
SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE AUTHORIZATION FOR PRIOR PERIOD ADJUSTMENT. Pur-
suant to Section 67-3604, Idaho Code, the Idaho Transportation Department is
hereby authorized and the Office of the State Controller shall make the nec-
essary prior period adjustments not to exceed $303,900 from the State High-
way (Dedicated) Fund and GARVEE Capital Project Fund for transactions incor-
rectly recorded in fiscal years 2020, 2021, and 2022.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.